dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX 2 Y 66
SFX 2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 biness's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 binesses [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 diness's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 dinesses [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 finess's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 finesses [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 giness's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 ginesses [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 e iness [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness [v][o]r 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 e iness's [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness's [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness's [v][o]r 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 e inesses [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 inesses [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 inesses [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 inesses [v][o]r 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 kiness's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 kiness's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 kinesses [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 kinesses [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 liness's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 linesses [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 miness's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 minesses [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 niness's [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 ninesses [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 piness's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 pinesses [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 riness [^aeiov][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 riness's [^aeiov][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 rinesses [^aeiov][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 siness's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 sinesses [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 tiness's [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 tinesses [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 viness's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 vinesses [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 ziness's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 zinesses [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX z Y 24
SFX z 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX z 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX z 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX z 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX z y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX z e ily [^aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX z 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX z 0 ily [aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [aiou]y 
SFX z ey ily ey 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX z 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX z 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX z 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX z 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX z 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX z 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX z 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX z 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX z 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX y Y 15
SFX y 0 ary ion 
SFX y e ary se 
SFX y 0 atory [^i]m 
SFX y e atory [mr]e 
SFX y 0 ery h 
SFX y im matory im 
SFX y 0 nery [aiu]n 
SFX y 0 ory [^aeous]t 
SFX y 0 ory s 
SFX y e ory te 
SFX y 0 ry [^aiou]n 
SFX y 0 ry [^ehmstn] 
SFX y 0 ry [^i]on 
SFX y 0 ry [^mrst]e 
SFX y 0 ry [aeous]t 
SFX O Y 25
SFX O 0 al [^ce]ur
SFX O 0 al [^f][nu][gt]e
SFX O e al [aioy][dp]e
SFX O 0 al [air]t
SFX O 0 al [cdghmpwx]
SFX O 0 al [ceos]t
SFX O 0 al [eimru][bfn]
SFX O 0 al [eo]nt
SFX O 0 al [ghiorstx][ao]n
SFX O e al [mnrsv]e
SFX O 0 al [nt]ant
SFX O 0 al a[ks]
SFX O 0 al ch[ei]
SFX O i al ci
SFX O 0 al ss
SFX O e al uge
SFX O 0 ial [^u]r
SFX O e ial [aei]ge
SFX O e ial [ai]ce
SFX O 0 ial [ce]ur
SFX O 0 ial eon
SFX O y ial y
SFX O e inal ude
SFX O 0 l a
SFX O 0 tal ut
SFX o Y 12
SFX o 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX o e ally [^bcgv]e 
SFX o 0 ally [^ipux]t 
SFX o 0 ally [^u]m 
SFX o y ally ty 
SFX o um ally um 
SFX o y ially [^t]y 
SFX o e ially [bcgv]e 
SFX o 0 ially [bcrx] 
SFX o 0 lly a 
SFX o 0 tally [iu]t 
SFX o 0 ually [px]t 
SFX W Y 30
SFX W e atic [^cx][aeioumy]me 
SFX W 0 atic [^r][aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 atic [d][r][aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 c [bdghlmnstz]i 
SFX W a c [i]a 
SFX W e c [o][l][i]e 
SFX W y etic thy 
SFX W 0 ic [^aeilmrsy] 
SFX W 0 ic [^aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 ic [^ay]l 
SFX W e ic [^b]le 
SFX W e ic [^cilmsz]e 
SFX W 0 ic [^e]r 
SFX W e ic [^hn][e]me 
SFX W y ic [^hs]y 
SFX W a ic [^im]a 
SFX W y ic [^t]hy 
SFX W 0 ic [hmv]er 
SFX W 0 ic [nx][ay]l 
SFX W le ic ble 
SFX W us ic us 
SFX W 0 lic [^nx][ay]l 
SFX W 0 matic [g][r][aeiou]m 
SFX W er ric [^hmv]er 
SFX W 0 tic [^u]s 
SFX W 0 tic ma 
SFX W se tic se 
SFX W y tic sy 
SFX W ze tic ze 
SFX W ce tific ce 
SFX w Y 9
SFX w 0 atical [aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 ical [^aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 ical [^aemry] 
SFX w 0 ical [^e]r 
SFX w a ical [^m]a 
SFX w e ical e 
SFX w y ical y 
SFX w er rical er 
SFX w 0 tical ma 
SFX 1 Y 10
SFX 1 0 atically [aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 cally [i] 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeimry] 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 ically [^e]r 
SFX 1 a ically [^m]a 
SFX 1 e ically e 
SFX 1 y ically y 
SFX 1 er rically er 
SFX 1 0 tically ma 
SFX 3 Y 27
SFX 3 e ist [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist [^eoy] 
SFX 3 0 ist [^r][^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist apy
SFX 3 o ist o 
SFX 3 y ist ropy
SFX 3 e ist's [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist's [^eoy] 
SFX 3 0 ist's [^r][^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist's apy 
SFX 3 o ist's o 
SFX 3 y ist's ropy 
SFX 3 e ists [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 y ists [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX 3 0 ists [^r][^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ists [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ists apy 
SFX 3 o ists o 
SFX 3 y ists ropy 
SFX 3 ce tist ce 
SFX 3 ce tist's ce 
SFX 3 ce tists ce 
SFX = Y 15
SFX = 0 essness ll
SFX = 0 essness's ll
SFX = 0 essnesses ll
SFX = y ilessness [^aeiou]y
SFX = y ilessness's [^aeiou]y
SFX = y ilessnesses [^aeiou]y
SFX = 0 lessness [^l]l
SFX = 0 lessness [^ly]
SFX = 0 lessness [aeiou]y
SFX = 0 lessness's [^l]l
SFX = 0 lessness's [^ly]
SFX = 0 lessness's [aeiou]y
SFX = 0 lessnesses [^l]l
SFX = 0 lessnesses [^ly]
SFX = 0 lessnesses [aeiou]y
SFX ~ Y 1
SFX ~ 0 ish .
SFX | Y 4
SFX | 0 ed [lrps]
SFX | e ed e
SFX | 0 ing [lrps]
SFX | e ing e
SFX ; Y 4
SFX ; 0 ing's [lrps]
SFX ; e ing's e
SFX ; 0 ings [lrps]
SFX ; e ings e
SFX í Y 3
SFX í 0 ist .
SFX í 0 ist's .
SFX í 0 ists .
SFX á Y 1
SFX á 0 like .
