dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
addition/oMSO
adenoid/OMSo
agricultural/SM3
agriculture/M3oS
ailuranthrope/1MW
aim/MRGDpSy
alchemy/W3SMw
algebraic/OY
algorithm/SWM1
altruist/1MSW
anchoret/WSM
anecdotal/3
angel/S1wMW
anthecology/Mw
antidemocratic/OY
apocrypha/oSM
apoplast/SMW
archaebacteria/MO
archive/ODRS3MG
areology/M3w
aroma/WSM1
array/á
artisan/OSMo
artist/W1y
atheist/M1SW
atria/OM
audiometer/SWM
autarchy/WSwM
auteur/SM3
avocation/MOoS
bacteria/MOo
bacteriology/MwW3S1
baptism/OoSM
barber/dy
barycentre/SMW
baulk/GZSMD2r
bawd/2ZSMz
bible/1wMS
biology/w3MW1S
bioregion/SMO
biota/1WSM
biotechnology/w3SM
bird/MSGRDá
black/DGYPSTM~
blear/SDGzZ
blond/TSMP~
Bolshevist/WMS
brain/GD2pMZS
bras/2GzZD
brave/DYyTGPSM
breast/DGMSp=
brown/~DTSMPGYZ
brush/prMDSGZá
bump/2SZGRDM
cajole/RLyDSG
calcanea/OM
camp/RGZSM2Dz
can/dz2SDRZrGyM
canoe/GD3SM
capita/onM
cartoon/~G3DMSZá
casuist/SMWy
cathode/SWMO
cause/OGnDMoRSp
chaology/3M
chapel/MyS
charisma/M1W
chat/GS2MZDz
chest/6ZSDM2z
chimaera/SMw
chop/R2ZSMzGD
chore/MoDSG
cinematograph/SMR1
cinematography/WSM
citizen/MYyS
clam/GMzZDS
cloaca/MO
cock/zGMDZSR
cold/MYSPT~
colloid/MoSO
colonial/MS3P
combination/oMO
commissure/SO
computation/oMO
conciliate/nGVyN
conspirator/SOoM
convention/SoM
conventional/3
copulate/GSyDn
cosmic/YO
counter-inflation/y
crane/GSDMá
crank/zMGSZTD~
cream/ZDRSzMG
criminology/3wMS
croak/RDZSGzM
crunch/MRSDZG2
crystallography/WM1
cuckold/MDGyS
cult/SM3W
culture/SMoDG
cylinder/wS1M
cyst/SWM
death/SMYpá
deep/MSYPT~
defame/yRnSGD
denial/MS3
dermatology/3SMw
determinist/SMW1
detriment/SoMO
dialect/wWSo1MO
diapir/SMW
ding/zDGZ
discriminate/SnDVGky
do/yzRJGT7M
doctrine/oMSO3
dove/~SMá
drape/RSDGy
dream/~6SM2GpZDRzká
drear/Zz
dry/YRDTGS~
dystonia/SMW
early/MST~
ecclesiology/3w1SM
echo/1dSM
ecology/WwS3M1
ecotone/SMO
education/FSMo
effigy/MSá
effort/SM=
electron/M1S
electrotechnology/3MSw
elocution/3SMy
empire/wS1MW
empt/zVZGSDv2
endometria/OMo
endoscope/MSWZ31
endothelia/OMo
entomology/3Mw
epicardia/MOo
epigraphy/31WSM
epimer/SMW
episode/MS1Ww
epoch/OMoé
eristic/MSOY
ethnobiology/Mw3	Noun: uncountable
ethnography/WMSw1
ethnology/W3SwM1
Etruscology/3Mw
Eucharist/MWSw1
exanthema/WSM
exclaim/yRSDG
exobiology/MS3w1
exon/SMW1
expedition/SyM
extrema/Oo
fact/SMyxYZ
fame/MDSz
feud/DMSoGO
fiend/SMá
flake/Z2MSr
flop/RZzSGDM
foil/MSDG3
folk/~SMá
forest/RMDSynG
formalist/SMW
freak/GSMDZ2
full/MY~
fur/GM2JZSD
fuss/SD2ZMGzr
gastroenterology/3w1M
gastronome/Z1SwM
gem/2GDMZSá
genera/onWM1Vv
genetic/OY3S
geomatic/O3
geometer/wS1MW
gimmick/SZMy
glass/pSzZGM6Dá
gloom/MDGZSz
glucoside/SMW1
glycogen/SMW
good/rSZPY~M
grouch/2ZDSzGM
gust/SD2MGzZn
guts/Z2r
gynoecia/MO
gypsy/SM~
gyroscope/SMW1
haematology/W3SMw
hair/DMSZ2pá
hairstyle/3MSG
hatch/GyDSJrM
Hebraist/MSW
heterology/SMw
hippopotami/MW
hog/RMDSGá
homeopathy/3SM
homoeotherm/ZWOSM
homomorph/WZSM1
hoyden/SMd~
huff/zSDZMG~
husband/pDYyGSMrá
hyperalgesia/WSM
hyperbole/Mw1SW
hypnotherapy/MS3
hypocrite/1wMS
hypoderm/MSo
hypotonia/SMW
idiot/1SMW
illustration/MO
immunobiology/Ww
inhibit/SVdyXNr
inquisitor/OoMS
instrumental/PS3M
interneuron/SMO
iron/prwMSd1WP3
isotope/SMW1Z
jaunt/Mz2GZS
jerk/zGZSMD2r
ju/y
kenotic/3
knight/pSYDMGá
Kurd/MS~
lab/oMS
lacuna/SMO
lamb/rSDGMá
leaf/pSD2GMZ
lee/SyM
Lett/SM~
leucocyte/SMW
lexicography/1WwMS
libretto/3MS
lithology/SMw1W
loft/SDzGMZr
long/JkTDSPG~
lubber/YSMá
lust/GZSDjz62M
macrophyte/SMW
macrosociology/wM
mammon/MS~
manipulate/BSGnyDVu
martyrology/SMw3
mediator/SMZO
medicine/MoS
medulla/SMy
melodrama/WSM1
mes/2DZzG
metallurgy/1MSwW3
metapsychology/SMw1
meteor/WS1M
microlite/WSM
microscope/SMWw1Z3
microstructure/SO^
mimic/RDGSy
miss/S~
monetary/3Y
monody/MWS3
mood/2MZSz
more/So~
morphology/3WMwS1
morphometry/1WMSw
mortise/SM|
mother/rYpdá
mud/SM2Zz
muddle/kRSGD2h
musicology/M3wS
mycelia/OM
myoclonus/W
nanotechnology/SM3w
near/SPGTDY~
need/ZDSpj26Gr
neonate/oSM
nephrology/w3M
nest/RGM7SDá
nicotine/SMW
nod/SZGMDoOw
nosology/SM1
novelette/SM3
nun/SyMá
obsequy/MOé
ochre/~MSZ
octahedra/Oo
old/TPY~
oliguria/SMW
ontology/1wMS3
oology/3wM
ornament/nMDGSo
osteodystrophy/SMW
oval/PSM~
ovulate/GySD
palaeoecology/SMw13
pantomimic/OY
parabola/1SWMw
parascience/MSW
parasitology/M3
park/ZSMGD~
past/DMS2GZy
path/pSM=
pathobiology/3wM
pentactin/OM
perk/SGzDM
person/7oSM
phagedena/SW
pharmacology/3M1SwW
phycology/3wM
pickpocket/SMy
pictorial/YPSM3
pig/SMDZGLá
pisciculture/MO3
pixie/MS~
planimeter/SMW1
plant/Má
polariscope/SMW
prestidigitator/MO
priest/pYGSDMá
probation/ROoyM
procedure/MSo
proctology/3w
pseudomorph/SGDW1M
psychiatry/W3MSw1
psychology/w13SMW
psychotechnic/O
puck/MSá
pulp/prDMS2GZ
puppet/MSy~
qualm/ZMS~
rad/SMw1
rand/2ZM
rat/ZSGRMdDá
raw/MPTY~
recriminate/VSyGDn
region/oSM
repression/SM3
retaliate/SVynGD
revision/Oy3G
rhythm/1MwSWp
ring/kDRMGpá
risk/GSZzDMp
room/Z6M2S
rose/MyZSp
rough/YTPDSG~
rush/MSGZDRá
Saracen/MSW
saw/SMGDá
scab/2GMZSD
schoolgirl/MS~
screw/MZS2GDr
sculpture/GDOoSM
semi-final/SM3
septa/MO
sex/RSzG3p2ZDM
sh/~
shade/MDpJSZG2r
sharp/DMSTY~
sheet/GMSDá
shod/zZ2
show/MGJmR2zSDZ
sill/2YSM
sleep/R2MZGSzp
slight/MPGYTDSk~
slime/2MSGDZ
smell/Y2GS7DrM
smooth/7DPTSRYG~
snake/SMDZGá
snoot/SzMZ
snow/ZmD2MGSp
society/oSM
socioecology/wW3SM
son/MW1SZp
sophist/S1yMWw
spark/pDYGZSM~
spiritualist/W1
sponge/M2SRDZGá
spot/2GDRSZzMp
squash/ZGDS2M
star/kMrdZpSDGá
stead/z2MZ
stick/RZS2GzM
sting/RZSGkz2p
stomachic/SMOY
straight/YPTS~
stylometry/MW1
succession/MSOo
such/á
sweat/RZSGMDz
sword/MmSá
symphony/SWM3
synchronistic/OY
tac/D2ZG
Talmud/M3Ww
taphonomy/SMW
telescope/MGS1DW
therm/oSMW
thick/YPT~
tin/DGZSMz2
tomb/pMSá
toxicology/3Mw1W
trachea/MO
transverse/SMYo
trend/DzZ2MSG
trick/ZzM2DGSR~
trope/WMSw1
troposphere/SMW
unilateral/Y3
vagina/SMOo
vibrate/DGnyS
vinegar/r3ZSM~
virtue/SoMp
war/MGDSpá
witch/GSDyMá
wobble/SMY2DGr
word/YM~
worm/MZDSGá
zoophile/SM3Z
